Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5129XS (3) 91 th/ns S.F. 2025 Section 1. Section 321.20, subsection 1, paragraph f, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 f. (1) If Except as provided in subparagraph (2), if the 3 vehicle is owned by a nonresident but is subject to issuance of 4 an Iowa certificate of title or registration, the application 5 shall must also contain the full legal name, Iowa driverâs 6 license number or Iowa nonoperatorâs identification card 7 number, date of birth, bona fide residence, and mailing address 8 of the primary user of the vehicle. If the primary user is a 9 firm, association, or corporation, the application shall must 10 contain the bona fide business address and federal employer 11 identification number of the primary user. The primary userâs 12 name and address shall not be printed on the registration 13 receipt or the certificate of title. 14 (2) If the vehicle is owned by a nonresident who owns real 15 property in this state, the vehicle is used primarily at the 16 Iowa property, and the vehicle is subject to issuance of an 17 Iowa certificate of title or registration, the application must 18 include reasonable proof, as determined by the department, that 19 the nonresident owns the property, and may contain the ownerâs 20 driverâs license number or nonoperatorâs identification card 21 number issued by another state in lieu of both the primary 22 userâs information required under subparagraph (1) and the 23 ownerâs Iowa driverâs license number or Iowa nonoperatorâs 24 identification card number required under paragraph âaâ . The 25 department shall adopt rules regarding acceptable proof of 26 ownership of the property required under this subparagraph. 27